Utah statutes.
32B-10-404.   Specific operational requirements for industrial or manufacturing use permit.

(1) (a)  In addition to complying with Section 32B-10-206, an industrial or manufacturing use permittee and staff of the industrial or manufacturing use permittee shall comply with this section.

(b)  Failure to comply as provided in Subsection (1)(a) may result in disciplinary action in accordance with Chapter 3, Disciplinary Actions and Enforcement Act, against:

(i)  an industrial or manufacturing use permittee;

(ii)  individual staff of an industrial or manufacturing use permittee; or

(iii)  an industrial or manufacturing use permittee and staff of the industrial or manufacturing use permittee.

(2)  An industrial or manufacturing use permittee may produce for lawful use and sale the following:

(a)  vinegar;

(b)  preserved nonintoxicating cider;

(c)  a food preparation;

(d)  a United States Pharmacopoeia or national formulary preparation in conformity with Title 58, Chapters 17b, 37, 37a, 37b, and 37c, if the preparation:

(i)  conforms to standards established by:

(A)  the Department of Agriculture and Food; and

(B)  the Department of Health; and

(ii)  contains no more alcohol than is necessary to preserve or extract the medicinal, flavoring, or perfumed properties of the treated substances; and

(e)  wood and denatured alcohol if manufactured in compliance with the formulas and regulations under Title 27, C.F.R. Parts 19, 20, and 21.

(3) (a)  An industrial or manufacturing use permittee that produces patent or proprietary medicines containing alcohol may sell or offer for sale the medicines in the original and unbroken container if the medicine contains sufficient medication to prevent its use as an alcoholic product.

(b)  An industrial or manufacturing use permittee described in this Subsection (3) shall, upon request by the department, provide a sufficient sample of the medicine to enable the department to have the medicine analyzed for purposes of this section.

